Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Part B
Free-Standing Skilled Care and Intermediate Care Facilities

§ 56-110 — 56-112. New and existing free-standing skilled care facilities — Free-standing intermediate care facilities. [Repealed.]

§ 56-113. Intermediate care facilities for people with intellectual disabilities. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 164, § 4, effective July 1, 2011.

§ 56-114. Freestanding special care facilities.

For a freestanding special care facility which seeks to contract for the first time to provide medicaid services to recipients, the director shall determine payment for such facility as specified in rule.

§ 56-115. Capitalization of assets. [Repealed.]

§ 56-117. Payment of special rates.

The director shall have authority to pay facilities at special rates for care given to patients who have long-term care needs not adequately reflected in the rates calculated pursuant to the principles set forth in section56-265, Idaho Code. The payment for such specialized care will be in addition to any payments made in accordance with other provisions of this chapter. The incremental cost to a facility that exceeds the rate for services provided pursuant to the provisions of section56-265, Idaho Code, will be excluded from the computation of payments or rates under other provisions of this chapter. Until the facility applies for a special rate, patients with such needs will be included in the computation of the facility’s rates following the principles described in section 265 [56-265], Idaho Code.

§ 56-118. Reimbursement rates.

The department shall implement a methodology for reviewing and determining reimbursement rates to private businesses providing developmental disability agency services, mental health services, service coordination and case management services and residential habilitation agency services by rule.

In addition to any policy or federal statutory requirements, such methodology shall incorporate, at a minimum, the actual cost of providing quality services, including personnel and total operating expenses, directly related to providing such services which shall be provided by the private business entities.

The results of this review and analysis do not guarantee a change in reimbursement rates, but shall be a fair and equitable process for establishing and reviewing such rates.

§ 56-119. [Reserved.]

§ 56-120. Property reimbursement for hospital-based skilled nursing facilities.

In addition to the basic payment per patient-day of care, each hospital-based nursing facility shall be paid on a prospective basis its actual property and utility costs per patient-day, to be determined by dividing its total projected property and utility costs, as calculated from the cost report selected for rate setting, by the total number of patient-days from the same cost reporting period.

§ 56-121. New hospital-based facilities. [Repealed.]

§ 56-122 — 56-129. [Reserved.]

§ 56-130. Development of payment, adjustment, audit and settlement mechanisms. [Repealed.]

§ 56-131. Multiple-use plans.

The director shall promulgate such rules, as the director deems advisable to enable and encourage facilities to adopt plans for offering additional services or programs within their institutions which will promote appropriate levels of care for recipients residing in their service areas and, as a result, achieve cost savings for the medicaid program. In developing such rules, the director shall consult with representatives of freestanding skilled care, freestanding intermediate care, freestanding special care, and hospital-based facilities.

§ 56-132. Disputes.

If any facility wishes to contest the way in which a rule or contract provision relating to the prospective, cost-related reimbursement system was applied to such facility by the director, it shall first pursue the administrative review process set forth in section 56-133, Idaho Code.

The administrative review process in section 56-133, Idaho Code, need not be exhausted if a facility wishes to challenge the legal validity of a statute, rule, or contract provision.

§ 56-133. Administrative review process.

Within thirty (30) days after a facility is notified of an action or determination it wishes to challenge, such facility shall request in writing that the director review such determination. The request shall be signed by the licensed administrator of the facility, shall identify the challenged determination and the date thereof, and shall state as specifically as practicable the grounds for its contention that the determination was erroneous. Copies of any documentation on which such facility intends to rely to support its position shall be included with the request.

After receiving a request meeting the above criteria, the director will contact the facility to schedule a conference for the earliest mutually convenient time. The conference shall be scheduled for no later than thirty (30) days after a properly-completed request is received, unless both parties agree in writing to a specified later date.

The facility and the director shall attend the conference. In addition, representatives selected by the facility may attend and participate. The facility shall bring to the conference, or provide to the director in advance of the conference, any documentation on which the facility intends to rely to support its contentions. The parties shall clarify and attempt to resolve the issues at the conference. If additional documentation is needed to resolve the issues, a second session of the conference shall be scheduled for not later than thirty (30) days after the initial session, unless both parties agree in writing to a specific later date.

A written decision by the director will be furnished to the facility within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of the conference.

If the facility desires review of an adverse decision of the director, it shall, within twenty-eight (28) days following receipt of such decision, request a hearing in writing on the contested matter, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 56-134. Denial, suspension, revocation of license or provisional license — Penalty.

The director is authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license or provisional license or, in lieu thereof or in addition thereto, assess monetary penalties of a civil nature not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation in any case in which it finds that the facility, or any partner, officer, director, owner of five per cent (5%) or more of the assets of the facility, or managing employee:

Failed or refused to comply with the requirements of this chapter, or the rules and regulations established hereunder; or

Has knowingly or with reason to know made a false statement of a material fact in any record required by this chapter; or

Refused to allow representatives or agents of the director to inspect all books, records, and files required to be maintained by the provisions of this chapter, or to inspect any portion of the facility’s premises; or

Wilfully prevented, interferred [interfered] with, or attempted to impede in any way the work of any duly authorized representative of the director and the lawful enforcement of any provision of this chapter; or

Wilfully prevented or interferred [interfered] with any representative of the director in the preservation of evidence of any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder.

§ 56-134A. Remedies for deficient care.

If the director finds that a facility is deficient in, or no longer meets, any of the requirements of participation set forth in 42 U.S.C. 1396r(b), (c) and (d), which are hereby incorporated by reference, the director has the authority, as provided in title XIX of the social security act, to:

terminate the facility’s participation in the medicaid program;

deny payment;

assess and collect a civil money penalty with interest;

appoint temporary management of the facility;

close the facility and/or transfer residents to another certified facility;

direct a plan of correction;

ban admission of persons with certain diagnoses or requiring specialized care;

ban all admissions to the facility;

assign monitors to the facility; or

reduce the licensed bed capacity.

§ 56-135. Adoption of rules.

The director shall adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind such administrative rules as are necessary to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, as provided in chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.